Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5831.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 543f. (1) A person is guilty of terrorism when that if the person knowingly and with premeditation commits an act of terrorism. (2) Terrorism A violation of subsection (1) is a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years, or but not less than 25 years. In addition, the court may impose a fine of not more than $100,000.00. , or both. However, except as provided in sections 25 and 25a of chapter IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.25 and 769.25a, if death was caused by the terrorist act, violation of subsection (1), the person shall must be punished by imprisonment for life without eligibility for parole. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.